Montana, session 2025, SB521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Direction to department of public health and human services and
office of public instruction. (1) The department of public health and human services in collaboration with the
office of public instruction shall develop a plan to expand the suicide prevention grants provided for in 53-21-
1111 into a universal program available in all public schools in the state. The program plan must include:
(a) program curriculum;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 521

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 521.1
(b) how the program will:
(i) provide financial and technical support to schools;
(ii) collect data;
(iii) measure program success;
(iv) target specific areas of mental health, including bullying, suicide, and substance use; and
(v) leverage the classroom experience of teachers;
(c) estimated cost projections;
(d) a plan for implementation of the program;
(e) requested support from the legislature to implement the program, through legislation,
appropriation, or other legislative action; and
(f) other information the department or office of public instruction consider necessary to establish
and implement the program.
(2) (a) By September 1, 2025, and January 1, 2026, the department of public health and human
services and the office of public instruction shall jointly report to the education interim committee and the
children, families, health, and human services interim committee on their progress toward the development of
the program.
(b) By May 1, 2026, the department of public health and human services and the office of public
instruction shall jointly submit the program plan pursuant to subsection (1) and report to the education interim
committee and the children, families, health, and human services interim committee on their progress toward
the development of the program.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Notification to tribal governments. The secretary of state shall send a
copy of [this act] to each federally recognized tribal government in Montana.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective upon passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 521